North Carolina, session 2025, HB946.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-270.20(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(7) Montessori license. – A license that allows the holder of the license to teach
only in a school that uses Montessori instruction as its primary method of
instruction. An individual holding a license pursuant to this subdivision may
not teach students in a public school that is not a Montessori school unless the
individual holds another license issued by the State for public school teachers.
To receive this license, an individual shall meet the following criteria:
a. Hold a valid credential from any of the following groups:
1. The American Montessori Society.
2. The Association Montessori Internationale.
3. A program accredited by the Montessori Accreditation Council
for Teacher Education.
b. Hold a bachelor's degree in any field.
c. Complete any examination requirements adopted by the State Board."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to applicants for
Montessori licenses on or after that date.
*H946-v-1*